Indiana, session 2026, HB1350.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-37-4-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, evidence that
is otherwise admissible may not be excluded as evidence against the
accused on the grounds that the evidence was obtained in violation
of the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of the
State of Indiana, or the laws of the United States or of Indiana,
except as provided by subsection (b).
(b) Otherwise admissible evidence may be excluded as evidence
against the accused if:
(1) the evidence was obtained by:
(A) deliberate, reckless, or grossly negligent conduct; or
(B) recurring or systemic negligence;
that violated the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States, as interpreted by the United States Supreme
Court, and made applicable to the states through the United
States Supreme Court's interpretations of the Fourteenth
2026 IN 1350—LS 7036/DI 106


Amendment to the Constitution of the United States; and
(2) a refusal to exclude the evidence would contradict a clearly
established holding of the United States Supreme Court.
(c) An Indiana court may not recognize or enforce an
exclusionary rule under Indiana law that extends beyond the
requirements of the federal exclusionary rule, as defined by the
United States Supreme Court.
(d) An order granting a motion to suppress evidence may be
immediately appealed to the supreme court under IC 35-38-4-2.
(e) Nothing in this section affects the right of a person to bring
a civil action against a law enforcement officer or governmental
entity to recover damages for the violation of the person's civil
rights by an unlawful search and seizure.
SECTION 2. IC 35-38-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Appeals to the supreme court or to the court
of appeals, as provided by court rules or Indiana law, may be taken by
the state as of right in the following cases:
(1) From an order granting a motion to dismiss one (1) or more
counts of an indictment or information.
(2) From an order granting a motion to discharge a defendant
before trial for any reason, including delay commencing trial or
after the defendant's plea of former jeopardy.
(3) From an order granting a motion to correct errors.
(4) Upon a question reserved by the state, if the defendant is
acquitted.
(5) From an order granting a motion to suppress evidence. if the
ultimate effect of the order is to preclude further prosecution of
one (1) or more counts of an information or indictment.
(b) The state may appeal an interlocutory order to the supreme court
or to the court of appeals, as provided by court rules, if the trial court
certifies the appeal and the court on appeal finds that:
(1) the state will suffer substantial expense, damage, or injury if
the order is erroneous and the determination thereof is withheld
until after judgment;
(2) the order involves a substantial question of law, the early
determination of which will promote a more orderly disposition
of the case; or
(3) the remedy by appeal after judgment is otherwise inadequate.
(c) An interlocutory order that may be appealed by the state under
subsection (b) includes but is not limited to:
(1) any order granting a motion to suppress evidence that is
2026 IN 1350—LS 7036/DI 106


substantially important to the prosecution and does not have the
ultimate effect of precluding further prosecution; and
(2) any discovery order claimed to violate a court rule, statute, or
case law.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, when the state appeals from
an order granting a motion to exclude evidence under subsection
(a)(5), the appeal shall be taken directly to the supreme court. The
supreme court shall:
(1) stay proceedings in the trial court until the appeal is fully
resolved; and
(2) expedite consideration of the appeal and resolve the appeal
as quickly as possible.
If the state acknowledges that a clearly established holding of the
United States Supreme Court requires the exclusion of the
evidence, and that the state is appealing to seek reversal or
reconsideration of that United States Supreme Court decision on
writ of certiorari, the supreme court shall summarily affirm the
order granting the motion to exclude evidence, without requesting
merits briefing or holding oral argument. However, proceedings in
the trial court remain stayed until the expiration of the period
described in subsection (e).
(e) The state may petition for a writ of certiorari from any
decision of the supreme court affirming the exclusion of the
disputed evidence. If the state petitions for certiorari, the stay of
proceedings required by subsection (d)(1) remains in effect until
the petition is finally disposed of.
2026 IN 1350—LS 7036/DI 106